finished/ben.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [STEM] [N] [ACC] [GEN] [LOC] [NOM] [DEF] [NDEF] [SG] [PL] [V] [NFIN] [1] [2] [3] [PRS] [PST] [FUT] [PRF] [PROG] [POL] [LGSPEC1] [INFM] [HAB] [ANIMATE] {টা|টাকে} {ই|ি} {ছি} {েছি} {ে} {িস} {েছে} {েছিস} {ছে} {ছিস} {ো} {েন} {েছো} {েছেন} {ছো} {ছেন} {বো} {বি} {বে} {বেন} {লাম} {তাম} {েছিলাম} {ছিলাম} {লো} {লি} {তো} {তিস} {েছিলো} {েছিলি} {ছিলো} {ছিলি} {লে} {লেন} {তে} {তেন} {েছিলে} {েছিলেন} {ছিলে} {ছিলেন} {েরা|গুলা} {দেরকে|গুলা} {ের} {দের|গুলার} {ে|তে}

LEXICON Root

[N]:0 Noun;
[V]:0 Verb;

!!!Noun!!!

LEXICON Noun

[STEM] NomNdef;
বোন:বোন[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
ছেলে:ছেলে[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
তিমি:তিমি[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
কুকুর:কুকুর[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
ছাত্র:ছাত্র[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
বন্ধু:বন্ধু[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
ব্যক্তি:ব্যক্তি[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
গাঁজাখোর:গাঁজাখোর[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
যৌনকর্মী:যৌনকর্মী[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
প্রতিষ্ঠাতা:প্রতিষ্ঠাতা[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
শিশু:শিশু[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
মানুষ:মানুষ[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
বান্ধবী:বান্ধবী[ANIMATE] NomNdef;
মিত্র:মিত্র[ANIMATE] NomNdef;

LEXICON NomNdef

[NOM][NDEF]:0   #;
0               NomDef;

LEXICON NomDef
[NOM][DEF][SG]:টা    #;
[NOM][DEF][PL]:{েরা|গুলা}  #;
0                   AccNdef;

LEXICON AccNdef
[ACC][NDEF]:0   #;
0               AccDef;

LEXICON AccDef
[ACC][DEF][SG]:{টা|টাকে} #;
[ACC][DEF][PL]:{দেরকে|গুলা} #;
0 GenNdef;

LEXICON GenNdef
[GEN][NDEF]:{ের} #;
0 GenDef;

LEXICON GenDef
[GEN][DEF][SG]:টার #;
[GEN][DEF][PL]:{দের|গুলার} #;
0 LocNdef;

LEXICON LocNdef
[LOC][NDEF]:{ে|তে} #;
0 LocDef;

LEXICON LocDef
[LOC][DEF][SG]:টাতে #;
[LOC][DEF][PL]:গুলাতে #;

!!!Verbs!!!

LEXICON Verb

[STEM] Nfin;
ওঠা:উঠা Nfin;
লেখা:লিখা Nfin;
খোলা:খুলা Nfin;
চেনা:চিনা Nfin;
ঢোকা:ঢুকা Nfin;
শেখা:শিখা Nfin;
কেনা:কিনা Nfin;
চোষা:চুষা Nfin;
গেলা:গিলা Nfin;
বোঝা:বুঝা Nfin;
শোনা:শুনা Nfin;
খোঁজা:খুঁজা Nfin;

LEXICON Nfin
[NFIN]:+{তে} #;
0 FirstPresent;

LEXICON FirstPresent
[1][PRS]:+{ই|ি} #;
[PROG][1][PRS]:+{ছি} #;
[PRF][1][PRS]:+{েছি} #;
0 SecondPresent;

LEXICON SecondPresent
[2][POL][PRS]:+{ে} #;
[2][PRS][LGSPEC1]:+{িস} #;
[PRF][2][POL][PRS]:+{েছে} #;
[PRF][2][PRS][LGSPEC1]:+{েছিস} #;
[PROG][2][POL][PRS]:+{ছে} #;
[PROG][2][PRS][LGSPEC1]:+{ছিস} #;
0 ThirdPresent;

LEXICON ThirdPresent
[3][INFM][PRS]:+{ো} #;
[3][POL][PRS]:+{েন} #;
[PRF][3][INFM][PRS]:+{েছো} #;
[PRF][3][POL][PRS]:+{েছেন} #;
[PROG][3][INFM][PRS]:+{ছো} #;
[PROG][3][POL][PRS]:+{ছেন} #;
0 FirstFuture;

LEXICON FirstFuture
[1][FUT]:+{বো} #;
0 SecondFuture;

LEXICON SecondFuture
[2][FUT][LGSPEC1]:+{বি} #;
[2][POL][FUT]:+{বে} #;
0 ThirdFuture;

LEXICON ThirdFuture
[3][INFM][FUT]:+{বে} #;
[3][POL][FUT]:+{বেন} #;
0 FirstPast;

LEXICON FirstPast
[1][PST]:+{লাম} #;
[HAB][1][PST]:+{তাম} #;
[PRF][1][PST]:+{েছিলাম} #;
[PROG][1][PST]:+{ছিলাম} #;
0 SecondPast;

LEXICON SecondPast
[2][POL][PST]:+{লো} #;
[2][PST][LGSPEC1]:+{লি} #;
[HAB][2][POL][PST]:+{তো} #;
[HAB][2][PST][LGSPEC1]:+{তিস} #;
[PRF][2][POL][PST]:+{েছিলো} #;
[PRF][2][PST][LGSPEC1]:+{েছিলি} #;
[PROG][2][POL][PST]:+{ছিলো} #;
[PROG][2][PST][LGSPEC1]:+{ছিলি} #;
0 ThirdPast;

LEXICON ThirdPast
[3][INFM][PST]:+{লে} #;
[3][POL][PST]:+{লেন} #;
[HAB][3][INFM][PST]:+{তে} #;
[HAB][3][POL][PST]:+{তেন} #;
[PRF][3][INFM][PST]:+{েছিলে} #;
[PRF][3][POL][PST]:+{েছিলেন} #;
[PROG][3][INFM][PST]:+{ছিলে} #;
[PROG][3][POL][PST]:+{ছিলেন} #;
